Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 1
MANDATORY PROVISIONS

25.5-5-101. Mandatory provisions - eligible groups - rules.

In order to participate in the medicaid program, the federal government requires the state to provide medical assistance to certain eligible groups. Pursuant to federal law and except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who is eligible for medical assistance under the mandated groups specified in this section must receive both the mandatory services that are specified in sections 25.5-5-102 and 25.5-5-103 and the optional services that are specified in sections 25.5-5-202 and 25.5-5-203. Subject to the availability of federal financial participation, the following are the individuals or groups that are mandated under federal law to receive benefits under this article 5 and articles 4 and 6 of this title 25.5:

Repealed.

Parents and caretaker relatives living with a dependent child who meet the eligibility criteria pursuant to section 1902 (a)(10)(A) of the federal "Social Security Act", including those who subsequently would have become ineligible under such eligibility criteria because of increased earnings or increased hours of employment whose eligibility is specified for a period of time by the federal government;

Pregnant women whose family income does not exceed one hundred thirty-three percent of the federal poverty line, adjusted for family size, who meet the requirements pursuant to section 1902 (a)(10)(A) of the federal "Social Security Act". Once initial eligibility has been established, the pregnant woman is continuously eligible throughout the pregnancy and for the sixty days following the pregnancy, even if the woman's eligibility would otherwise terminate during such period due to an increase in income.

A newborn child born of a woman who is categorically needy. Such child is deemed medicaid-eligible on the date of birth and remains eligible for one year.

Children for whom adoption assistance or foster care maintenance payments are made under Title IV-E of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, including foster care children, pursuant to section 1902 (a)(10)(A)(i)(IX) of the federal "Social Security Act", who are under twenty-six years of age, who were in foster care under the responsibility of the state or a tribe, and who were enrolled in medicaid under the state medicaid plan when they turned eighteen years of age;

Individuals receiving supplemental security income;

Individuals receiving mandatory state supplement, including but not limited to individuals receiving old age pensions;

Institutionalized individuals who were eligible for medical assistance in December 1973;

Individuals who would be eligible except for the increase in old-age, survivors, and disability insurance under Pub.L. 92-336;

Individuals who become ineligible for cash assistance as a result of old-age, survivors, and disability insurance cost-of-living increases after April 1977;

Disabled widows or widowers fifty through sixty years of age who have become ineligible for federal supplemental security income or state supplementation as a result of becoming eligible for federal social security survivor's benefits, in accordance with the social security act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 1383c;

Individuals with income and resources at a level which qualifies them as medicare-eligible under section 301 of Title III of the federal "Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act";

Children under the age of nineteen who meet the eligibility criteria pursuant to section 1902 (a)(10)(A) of the federal "Social Security Act".

A qualified alien who entered the United States before August 22, 1996, who meets the exceptions described in the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996", Public Law 104-193, as amended, shall receive benefits under this article and articles 4 and 6 of this title.

A qualified alien who entered the United States on or after August 22, 1996, shall not be eligible for benefits under this article or article 4 or 6 of this title, except as provided in section 25.5-5-103 (3), for five years after the date of entry into the United States unless he or she meets the exceptions described in the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996", Public Law 104-193, as amended.

Notwithstanding the five-year waiting period established in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), but subject to the availability of sufficient appropriations and the receipt of federal financial participation, the state department may provide benefits under this article and articles 4 and 6 of this title to a pregnant woman who is a qualified alien and a child under nineteen years of age who is a qualified alien so long as such woman or child meets eligibility criteria other than citizenship.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article and articles 4 and 6 of this title 25.5, as a condition of eligibility for medical assistance under this article 5 and articles 4 and 6 of this title 25.5, a person who is lawfully residing in the state shall agree to refrain from executing an affidavit of support for the purpose of sponsoring an alien on or after July 1, 1997, under rules promulgated by the immigration and naturalization service, or any successor agency, during the pendency of the lawfully residing person's receipt of medical assistance. Nothing in this subsection (3) affects a lawfully residing person's eligibility for medical assistance pursuant to this article 5 and articles 4 and 6 of this title 25.5 based upon the lawfully residing person's responsibilities under an affidavit of support entered into before July 1, 1997.

An asset test shall not be applied as a condition of eligibility for individuals or families described in paragraphs (b), (c), (d), and (e) of subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1854, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(2)(b) amended, (HB 09-1353), ch. 360, p. 1869, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

L. 2010:

(4)(c) added, (HB 10-1043), ch. 92, p. 312, § 1, effective April 15; (1)(m) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2110, § 143, effective August 11.

L. 2011:

(3) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1168, § 67, effective August 10.

L. 2014:

(1)(a) repealed and (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d), (1)(e), (1)(m), and (4) amended, (SB 14-067), ch. 12, p. 111, § 3, effective February 27.

L. 2022:

IP(1) amended, (SB 22-052), ch. 43, p. 216, § 2, effective March 24; (3) amended, (HB 22-1289), ch. 399, p. 2842, § 15, effective June 7.

25.5-5-102. Basic services for the categorically needy - mandated services.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section and section

25.5-4-104

, the program for the categorically needy shall include the following services as mandated and defined by federal law:

Inpatient hospital services;

Outpatient hospital services;

Other laboratory and X-ray services;

Physicians' services, wherever furnished;

Nursing facility services;

Home health services;

Early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment, as required by federal law;

Family planning, including a one-year supply of any federal food and drug administration-approved contraceptive drug, device, or product, unless the recipient requests a supply covering a shorter period of time;

Rural health services;

Advanced practice registered nurse services;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 138, § 2, effective July 1, 2008.)

Federally qualified health centers.

In order to keep expenditures within approved appropriations, the state board may, by rule, establish limits on a service provided pursuant to this section so long as the service provided is sufficient in the amount, duration, and scope to reasonably achieve the purpose of the service as required by federal law or regulation. When a rule is promulgated pursuant to this subsection (2), the state board shall provide a summary report of the limitations established by the rule and any fiscal impact of the rule to members of the health and human services committees of the senate and house of representatives, or any successor committees, and any other members of the general assembly who request the reports.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1856, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(j), (1)(k), and (1)(l) amended, p. 138, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(h) amended, (SB 21-009), ch. 430, p. 2847, § 3, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-202 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

(1) For the definition of "federally qualified health centers" in the federal "Social Security Act", see 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395x.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 21-009, see section 1 of chapter 430, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

25.5-5-103. Mandated programs with special state provisions - rules.

This section specifies programs developed by Colorado to meet federal mandates. These programs include but are not limited to:

Repealed.

Special provisions relating to nursing facilities, as specified in sections 25.5-6-201 to 25.5-6-203, 25.5-6-205, and 25.5-6-206;

The program for qualified medicare beneficiaries, as specified in section 25.5-5-104;

The program for qualified disabled and working individuals, as specified in section 25.5-5-105;

Special provisions for the purchase of group health insurance for recipients, as specified in section 25.5-4-210;

The program to provide health services to students by school districts as specified in section 25.5-5-318.

The medical assistance program also is subject to special provisions relating to the use of public funds for abortion which are required by section 50 of article V of the Colorado constitution. Those special provisions are specified in section 25.5-4-415.

Emergency medical assistance shall be provided to any person who is not a citizen of the United States, including undocumented aliens, aliens who are not qualified aliens, and qualified aliens who entered the United States on or after August 22, 1996, who has an emergency medical condition and meets one of the categorical requirements set forth in section 25.5-5-101; except that such persons shall not be required to meet any residency requirement other than that required by federal law.

The state board shall adopt rules necessary for the implementation of this subsection (3), including in such rules definitions of "emergency services", "emergency medical condition", "geographic area", and "prenatal care".

The state department shall ensure that benefits under the medical assistance program for behavioral, mental health, and substance use disorder services are no less extensive than benefits for any physical illness and are in compliance with the MHPAEA, as defined in section 25.5-5-403 (5.7), including the quantitative and nonquantitative treatment limitation requirements specified in 42 CFR 438.910 (c) and (d). On or after January 1, 2020, if an MCE, as defined in section 25.5-5-403 (4), denies coverage for a covered behavioral, mental health, or substance use disorder benefit or service based on diagnosis, the state board shall establish, by rule, a procedure to allow for reimbursement of medically necessary state plan services under the medical assistance program. The state department may use multiple payment modalities to comply with this subsection (4).

The state board shall adopt rules establishing the procedures for reimbursement pursuant to this subsection (4) by January 1, 2020.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1856, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(1)(a) repealed, (SB 14-067), ch. 12, p. 113, § 4, effective February 27.

L. 2019:

(4) added, (HB 19-1269), ch. 195, p. 2132, § 11, effective May 16.

L. 2021:

(4)(a) amended, (SB 21-266), ch. 423, p. 2802, § 22, effective July 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-203 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Care Coverage Modernization Act") in HB 19-1269, see section 1 of chapter 195, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

25.5-5-104. Qualified medicare beneficiaries.

Qualified medicare beneficiaries are medicare-eligible individuals with income and resources at a level which qualifies them as eligible under section 301 of Title III of the federal "Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act of 1988", as amended, or subsequent amending federal legislation. For purposes of this article and articles 4 and 6 of this title, such individuals shall be referred to as "qualified medicare beneficiaries". The state department is hereby designated as the single state agency to administer benefits available to qualified medicare beneficiaries in accordance with Title XIX and this article and articles 4 and 6 of this title. Such benefits are limited to medicare cost-sharing expenses as determined by the federal government. Accordingly, the state department shall not be required to provide qualified medicare beneficiaries the entire range of services set forth in section 25.5-5-102.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1857, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-510 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For provisions of the federal "Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act of 1988" referenced in this section, see section 301 of Pub.L. 100-360, codified at 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396a et seq.

25.5-5-105. Qualified disabled and working individuals.

Qualified disabled and working individuals are persons with income and resources and disability status, as determined by the social security administration, which qualify them as "qualified disabled and working individuals" under sections 6012 and 6408 of the federal "Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1989", or subsequent amending federal legislation. The state department is hereby designated as the single state agency to administer benefits available to qualified disabled and working individuals. Such benefits are limited to medicare cost-sharing expenses as determined by the federal government. Accordingly, the state department shall not be required to provide qualified disabled and working individuals the entire range of services set forth in section 25.5-5-102.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1858, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-511 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For provisions of the federal "Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1989" referenced in this section, see sections 6012 and 6408 of Pub.L. 101-239, codified at 42 U.S.C. secs. 1395i and 1396a.